California, session 20252026, SB945.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) According to data from Cardiac Arrest Registry to Enhance Survival (CARES), sudden cardiac arrest (SCA) is a leading cause of death in the United States, with more than 350,000 out-of-hospital cardiac arrests occurring annually and nearly 90 percent resulting in death; California has the highest number of cardiac arrests with one of the nation’s lowest survival rates at just 8.7 percent, which is in part attributed to only 42 percent of individuals suffering a cardiac arrest receiving cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and approximately 9 percent receiving a shock from an automated external defibrillator (AED).(b) Cardiac arrest can occur without warning and affects individuals of all ages, including approximately 23,000 children under 18 years of age each year outside of a hospital setting.(c) Survival from SCA is highly time sensitive, with a victim’s chance of survival decreasing by 7 to 10 percent for every minute without CPR or defibrillation.(d) Immediate bystander intervention using CPR and AED can double or triple a victim’s chance of survival, yet many individuals do not act due to lack of training or confidence.(e) National medical experts, including the American College of Cardiology, the American Academy of Pediatrics, and the American Heart Association, identify widespread CPR and AED education as a critical, evidence-based strategy to improve survival rates and recommend that pupils receive training before graduating high school.(f) Schools are uniquely positioned to provide universal access to CPR and AED instruction, and research shows that pupils can effectively learn these skills through brief, scalable training.(g) However, current law links CPR instruction to the presence of a health education course, resulting in inconsistent implementation across local educational agencies and, according to data from the State Department of Education, resulting in an estimated 40 percent (758,000) of California’s public high school pupils being excluded from this learning.(h) As a result, pupil access to CPR and AED training varies based on local curriculum decisions, creating inequitable access to lifesaving skills.(i) These disparities disproportionately affect pupils in underresourced communities, where access to health education courses is less consistent, with 77 percent of excluded pupils identifying as other than White and 65 percent identified as having a socioeconomically disadvantaged status, according to data from the State Department of Education.(j) At the same time, significant inequities exist in cardiac arrest outcomes: individuals in low-income communities and communities of color are less likely to receive bystander CPR, and Black and Hispanic individuals experience lower rates of intervention compared to White individuals.(k) These disparities contribute to lower survival rates and reflect broader inequities in access to emergency preparedness and health education.(l) Physical education is a standard requirement for high school pupils, providing a universal point of access that reaches all pupils regardless of whether a local educational agency requires a health education course.(m) Incorporating CPR and AED training into the physical education curriculum framework would ensure consistent, statewide access to lifesaving instruction and eliminate disparities caused by uneven health course requirements.(n) The Instructional Quality Commission should consider integrating CPR and AED training into the physical education curriculum framework to promote equitable access and align lifesaving skills instruction with a course required of all pupils.(o) Expanding universal CPR and AED training in high schools is an evidence-based strategy to increase bystander intervention rates and reduce disparities in survival outcomes.(p) Emergency medical services often cannot arrive within the critical window needed to prevent death or severe brain injury, making immediate bystander action essential.(q) Training all pupils before graduation will increase the number of individuals prepared to respond in emergencies and strengthen community resilience.(r) A majority of states have already adopted CPR training requirements for high school graduation, reflecting a national consensus on the importance of this policy.(s) CPR and AED training is a low-cost, high-impact intervention that equips pupils with practical, lifesaving skills.SEC. 2. Section 33549 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 33548, to read:33549. When the physical education framework is next revised after January 1, 2027, the commission shall consider including content on the importance, performance, and use of compression-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillators in that framework.SECTION 1.Section 51225.6 of the Education Code is amended to read:51225.6.(a)Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school maintaining any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall provide instruction in performing compression-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and how to use an automated external defibrillator (AED) as part of a course required for graduation. This instruction shall include all of the following:(1)An instructional program based on national evidence-based emergency cardiovascular care guidelines for the performance of compression-only CPR, such as those developed by the American Heart Association or the American Red Cross.(2)Instruction to pupils relative to the psychomotor skills necessary to perform compression-only CPR. For purposes of this paragraph, “psychomotor skills” means skills that pupils are required to perform as hands-on practice to support cognitive learning.(3)(A)Instruction to pupils on the use and importance of an AED. (B)If no AED is available, subparagraph (A) may be satisfied through the use of free, online video resources.(b)Before the commencement of the 2027–28 school year, the department shall provide guidance on how to implement this section, including, but not limited to, who may provide instruction pursuant to this section.(c)The governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school may adopt policies to implement this section.(d)(1)The governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school providing instruction in performing compression-only CPR and the use of an AED pursuant to this section is encouraged to use the most cost-effective means possible to implement that requirement.(2)This section shall not be construed to require the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school to make any purchases, including, but not limited to, purchasing an AED.(e)(1)A local agency, entity of state or local government, or other public or private organization that sponsors, authorizes, supports, finances, or supervises the instruction of pupils in compression-only CPR or the use of an AED pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any civil damages alleged to result from the acts or omissions of an individual who received that instruction.(2)A public employee who provides or facilitates the instruction of pupils in compression-only CPR or the use of an AED pursuant to this section shall not be liable for any civil damages alleged to result from the acts or omissions of an individual who received that instruction.(3)This subdivision shall not be construed to grant immunity from civil damages to any person who provides or facilitates the instruction of pupils in compression-only CPR or the use of an AED in a manner that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.SEC. 2.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________